Illinois, session 104th, SB2143.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 18d-123 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/18d-123 new)7    Sec. 18d-123. Private property towing.8    (a) Before towing a vehicle located on private property, a 9commercial vehicle safety relocator shall give notice to the 10owner of the vehicle by placing a notice in a conspicuous 11location on the car, but not in a location that may obstruct 12the driver's view. The notice shall include a time-stamp and 13GPS location to confirm the location of the vehicle. The 14commercial vehicle safety relocator shall then wait at least 15one hour before towing the vehicle.16    (b) In no event shall a property owner, property manager, 17or government-owned property manager enforce a registration 18sticker violation, including expiration of the registration 19sticker or failure to display the registration sticker, for 20any vehicle located on the property and have the vehicle towed 21based on the registration sticker violation.22    (c) No property owner or property manager shall have a 23vehicle towed or threaten to have a vehicle towed off the   SB2143- 2 -LRB104 06267 LNS 16302 b1property if the owner of the vehicle is in the process of being 2evicted from the property.3    (d) If a vehicle is a hazard to the community and requires 4immediate removal, then local law enforcement may impound the 5vehicle from the private property with the consent of the 6property owner. The property owner shall not allow any other 7entity to tow the vehicle under this subsection.8    (e) Within 72 hours of a vehicle being towed, a commercial 9vehicle safety relocator shall provide the vehicle owner with 10a statement that provides clear evidence of the violation for 11which the vehicle was towed. This statement may include, but 12is not limited to, a time-stamped photograph and GPS location 13of the vehicle during the violation. 14    (f) Every vehicle used by a commercial vehicle safety 15relocator must be owned or leased directly by the commercial 16vehicle safety relocator. Every vehicle used by a commercial 17vehicle safety relocator must display the same signage 18displayed at the property of the commercial vehicle safety 19relocator's impound lot.20    (g) Every commercial vehicle safety relocator shall 21display a copy of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly at all of its impound lots. The display shall be in a 23conspicuous location and in 2-inch letters. The display shall 24clearly state that a brochure containing the full details of 25this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly is available 26upon request to the commercial vehicle safety relocator at no   SB2143- 3 -LRB104 06267 LNS 16302 b1additional cost to the vehicle owner. 2    (h) A commercial vehicle safety relocator shall update its 3contracts with property owners every 12 months. The contracts 4shall include a clause stating that the contract does not 5automatically renew and the contract will expire in 12 months, 6requiring a new contract to be signed. 7    (i) Any commercial vehicle safety relocator that violates 8this Section shall be subject to a $500 fine for each violation 9and a hearing before the Commission. The Commission, in its 10discretion, may impose additional penalties on the commercial 11vehicle safety relocator, including, suspension or revocation 12of the commercial vehicle safety relocator's license or other 13disciplinary action. 14    (j) This Section applies only to towing vehicles located 15on private property.